Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article II The Legislature

Section 1. Legislative Power; Membership.

The legislative power of the State is vested in a legislature consisting of a senate with a membership of twenty and a house of representatives with a membership of forty.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendments proposed by 2010 Legislative Resolve 53 (SJR 21 am H) (number of house and senate districts) were rejected by voters.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The apparent invalidity of Alaska’s apportionment plan does not transform its legislature into an illegal assembly, prohibited from meeting and enacting laws. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Distinction between legislative and executive powers. See July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Vesting authority in the legislative Budget and Audit Committee to approve transfers between appropriation items violates the separation of powers doctrine and is an improper delegation of a legislative function to an interim committee. July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 13(3) of the 1976 budget bill, which authorized the Budget and Audit Committee to supervise the governor’s execution of the budget act, specifically over that portion of it which permitted him to transfer appropriation items constituted an encroachment on executive power and offended the Alaska Constitution. July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 2. Members: Qualifications.

A member of the legislature shall be a qualified voter who has been a resident of Alaska for at least three years and of the district from which elected for at least one year, immediately preceding his filing for office. A senator shall be at least twenty-five years of age and a representative at least twenty-one years of age.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Any senator or representative who is sworn into office is entitled to all the rights, duties, privileges and compensation of that office from the date he is sworn in to the date he should leave office, whether that should be by resignation, action of his house, death, the running of his term or otherwise. This includes senators and representatives subject to the constitutional disabilities set forth in this section. February 9, 1960 Op. Att’y Gen.

Bills passed by the senate during period of service in that body of a senator who was at that time less than 25 years of age were valid. February 9, 1960 Op. Att’y Gen.

The state legislature may not change the qualifications for a public office where the state constitution has set forth the qualifications and the constitution has not specifically provided that the legislature has the power to change or add to the qualifications. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

A statute declaring a candidate defeated in the primary election ineligible to run in the general election is unconstitutional, as it provides a change in the qualifications required for holding “constitutionally” created public offices. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Section 3. Election and Terms.

Legislators shall be elected at general elections. Their terms begin on the fourth Monday of the January following election unless otherwise provided by law. The term of representatives shall be two years, and the term of senators, four years. One-half of the senators shall be elected every two years.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions changing the date on which terms begin, see AS

24.05.080

.

Section 4. Vacancies.

A vacancy in the legislature shall be filled for the unexpired term as provided by law. If no provision is made, the governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions for filling vacancies, see AS

15.40.320

—15.40.470.

Section 5. Disqualifications.

No legislator may hold any other office or position of profit under the United States or the State. During the term for which elected and for one year thereafter, no legislator may be nominated, elected, or appointed to any other office or position of profit which has been created, or the salary or emoluments of which have been increased, while he was a member. This section shall not prevent any person from seeking or holding the office of governor, secretary of state, or member of Congress. This section shall not apply to employment by or election to a constitutional convention.

Revisor’s notes. —

Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, “changing the name of the secretary of state to lieutenant governor” in 16 sections of the Alaska Constitution, approved by the voters August 25, 1970, inadvertently omitted express amendment of this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The purpose of the prohibition is to remove temptation and improper motives from considerations of legislators in voting for increased salaries or the creation of new offices. June 29, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Because prohibitions like this are contrary to general public policy which favors eligibility for office, they are usually given a literal construction and are rarely expanded beyond their literal terms. June 29, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under

Warwick v. State ex rel. Chance

, 548 P.2d 384 (Alaska 1976), a member of one house of the legislature may run for a seat in the other house, when the pay for that seat in the other house has been increased by the legislature in which the candidate served. June 29, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Reading the prohibition purely literally it does not apply to a legislator’s running for a seat in the other house of the legislature. His office, that of a “legislator,” remains the same. While the term of office differs (four years for members of the senate, two years for members of the house) and the constituency may differ, the “office” of “legislator” is constant. June 29, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

While the supreme court has limited the exceptions to the operation of this section to those expressly made by the Alaska Constitution, no exception is required for a legislator’s running for legislative office, because the prohibition has no application and should not be expanded to apply to that situattion. June 29, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Neither a legislator nor the governor may sit as a regent of the University of Alaska while holding office. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

It would not be constitutional for the chairmen of the House and Senate finance committees to be members of the State Bond Committee. November 16, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The prohibitions contained in this section are literally and strictly enforced. November 16, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 6. Immunities.

Legislators may not be held to answer before any other tribunal for any statement made in the exercise of their legislative duties while the legislature is in session. Members attending, going to, or returning from legislative sessions are not subject to civil process and are privileged from arrest except for felony or breach of the peace.

Cross references. —

For limitation on the governor’s power to sue the legislature, see art. III, sec. 16 of this constitution.

For immunity of legislators before tribunals, see AS

24.40.010

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A “session” is the sitting of the legislature during the period of time that it is convened as a legislature to do business as a legislative body. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Immunity against civil process cannot be waived by the legislator since the Alaska immunity is intended to protect the public as well as serve the convenience of the legislators. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Executions are “civil process.” 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

The immunity of legislators under this section runs from the time the member is “going to” or “returning” from a legislative session; 24 hours a day, seven days a week from the time that the legislature is convened to the time that it adjourns sine die. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Members of the legislature have only a “privilege” from arrest, which must be asserted or it may be deemed waived. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

The privilege from arrest does not extend to those violations of our law which constitute a “felony or breach of the peace”; in these two categories a member of the state legislature stands in the eyes of the law as any other citizen. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Section 7. Salary and Expenses.

Legislators shall receive annual salaries. They may receive a per diem allowance for expenses while in session and are entitled to travel expenses going to and from sessions. Presiding officers may receive additional compensation.

Section 8. Regular Sessions.

The legislature shall convene in regular session each year on the fourth Monday in January, but the month and day may be changed by law. The legislature shall adjourn from regular session no later than one hundred twenty consecutive calendar days from the date it convenes except that a regular session may be extended once for up to ten consecutive calendar days. An extension of the regular session requires the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the membership of each house of the legislature. The legislature shall adopt as part of the uniform rules of procedure deadlines for scheduling session work not inconsistent with provisions controlling the length of the session.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions changing the date the legislature convenes, see AS

24.05.090

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective December 30, 1984 (13th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 2 (1983)) added the second, third, and fourth sentences.

Section 9. Special Sessions.

Special sessions may be called by the governor or by vote of two-thirds of the legislators. The vote may be conducted by the legislative council or as prescribed by law. At special sessions called by the governor, legislation shall be limited to subjects designated in his proclamation calling the session, to subjects presented by him, and the reconsideration of bills vetoed by him after adjournment of the last regular session. Special sessions are limited to thirty days.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions related to special sessions, see AS

24.05.100

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective December 23, 1976 (9th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 11 (1975)), in the third sentence, deleted “or” preceding “to subjects” and added “and the reconsideration of bills vetoed by him after adjournment of the last regular session” to the end.

Opinions of attorney general. —

In the call for the special session, the governor may designate for consideration bills pending from the legislature’s first regular session. June 20, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

So long as they are designated as subjects in the governor’s call or subsequently presented by him to the special session, bills which have passed one house in a regular session may be acted upon by the other house in a special session. June 20, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

72 Am.Jur.2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, § 46.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 105, 106.

Section 10. Adjournment.

Neither house may adjourn or recess for longer than three days unless the other concurs. If the two houses cannot agree on the time of adjournment and either house certifies the disagreement to the governor, he may adjourn the legislature.

Section 11. Interim Committees.

There shall be a legislative council, and the legislature may establish other interim committees. The council and other interim committees may meet between legislative sessions. They may perform duties and employ personnel as provided by the legislature. Their members may receive an allowance for expenses while performing their duties.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendments proposed by 1978 Legislative Resolve 39 (HCS SJR 16) (approval of budget revisions) and 1980 Legislative Resolve 42 (SCS HJR 80) (approval of budget revisions) were rejected by voters.

Section 12. Rules.

The houses of each legislature shall adopt uniform rules of procedure. Each house may choose its officers and employees. Each is the judge of the election and qualifications of its members and may expel a member with the concurrence of two-thirds of its members. Each shall keep a journal of its proceedings. A majority of the membership of each house constitutes a quorum to do business, but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day and may compel attendance of absent members. The legislature shall regulate lobbying.

Cross references. —

For proceedings when a successful candidate for the state legislature or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of that candidate has been convicted of a violation of the state election campaign laws, see AS

15.13.380(i)(1)

; for statutory provisions relating to lobbying, see AS 24.45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature may provide by law for appeal to the courts to decide election contests involving members of the legislature or Congress. March 29, 1963 Op. Att’y Gen.

But the legislature is the sole judge of the election and qualifications of its members. February 9, 1960 Op. Att’y Gen.; March 29, 1963 Op. Att’y Gen.

The power to provide for additional grounds upon which to base an appeal to the courts in no way limits the legislature’s constitutional power to be the sole judge of the election and qualifications of its members. March 29, 1963 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 13. Form of Bills.

Every bill shall be confined to one subject unless it is an appropriation bill or one codifying, revising, or rearranging existing laws. Bills for appropriations shall be confined to appropriations. The subject of each bill shall be expressed in the title. The enacting clause shall be: “Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Alaska.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The people, in exercising their power under the Alaska Const., art. XI, § 2, are in a sense acting as a larger legislative body of the state, and this section does not restrict its effect to operation upon legislative bills alone. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 36.

Unless constitutional provisions relating to the form of bills are expressly made inapplicable to acts proposed and enacted by the initiative, such restrictions as to form will apply to acts proposed by the initiative. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 36.

The requirement that the secretary of state [now lieutenant governor] certify the form of an application under the Alaska Const., art. XI, § 2, would be meaningless if the general provisions of this section did not apply; there would be nothing to certify to since the article on initiative sets out no particular form of an initiative. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 36.

Alaska Const., art. XI, § 2, states that an application should contain the “bill” to be initiated; and this section of the constitution deals with the form of “every bill.” It is not to be presumed that the delegates to the constitutional convention intended to use varying definitions of the same words. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 36.

Section 14. Passage of Bills.

The legislature shall establish the procedure for enactment of bills into law. No bill may become law unless it has passed three readings in each house on three separate days, except that any bill may be advanced from second to third reading on the same day by concurrence of three-fourths of the house considering it. No bill may become law without an affirmative vote of a majority of the membership of each house. The yeas and nays on final passage shall be entered in the journal.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions relating to enactments, see AS 24.08.

Section 15. Veto.

The governor may veto bills passed by the legislature. He may, by veto, strike or reduce items in appropriation bills. He shall return any vetoed bill, with a statement of his objections, to the house of origin.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The purpose of the veto is to prevent the adoption of undesirable legislation; the veto power is not a power to change the effect of proposed laws or to do anything concerning them except to approve or disapprove them as a whole. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The veto power may be exercised only against entire bills; and it may not be exercised upon sections of bills except in the case of appropriation bills. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The referendum is a veto power that is analogous to the veto power vested in the governor by this section. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The referendum and the veto power serve similar functions in the legislative process; hence, the limitations of one apply to the other, except as distinctions are specified in the constitution. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The governor’s authority under the constitution is to reduce or strike appropriation items by veto and no other way. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

For the legislature to authorize or direct the governor to exercise what amounts to a year-long continuing veto over items of appropriation, violates this section. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

The constitution provides the sole authority of the governor when he acts in a legislative capacity. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

Section 16. Action Upon Veto.

Upon receipt of a veto message during a regular session of the legislature, the legislature shall meet immediately in joint session and reconsider passage of the vetoed bill or item. Bills to raise revenue and appropriation bills or items, although vetoed, become law by affirmative vote of three-fourths of the membership of the legislature. Other vetoed bills become law by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the membership of the legislature. Bills vetoed after adjournment of the first regular session of the legislature shall be reconsidered by the legislature sitting as one body no later than the fifth day of the next regular or special session of that legislature. Bills vetoed after adjournment of the second regular session shall be reconsidered by the legislature sitting as one body no later than the fifth day of a special session of that legislature, if one is called. The vote on reconsideration of a vetoed bill shall be entered on the journals of both houses.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. II, § 15.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective December 23, 1976 (9th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 11(1975)) inserted “during a regular session of the legislature” in the first sentence and added the present fourth and fifth sentences.

Section 17. Bills Not Signed.

A bill becomes law if, while the legislature is in session, the governor neither signs nor vetoes it within fifteen days, Sundays excepted, after its delivery to him. If the legislature is not in session and the governor neither signs nor vetoes a bill within twenty days, Sundays excepted, after its delivery to him, the bill becomes law.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. II, § 15. For time statutes become law and take effect, see AS

01.10.070

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where the legislature is in session and the bill under consideration does not have an effective date clause, then, in that event, under the provisions of this section, the bill becomes law on the 16th day, excluding Sundays, after its delivery to the governor because of the nonaction on the part of the chief executive, and under the Alaska Constitution, art. II, § 18, the law being considered becomes effective on the 90th day after enactment of the bill into law. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

If the legislature is not in session and the bill under consideration does not have an effective date clause, then, in that event, under the provisions of this section the bill becomes law on the 21st day, excluding Sundays, after its delivery to the governor, and, under the Alaska Constitution, art. II, § 18, the law becomes effective on the 90th day after enactment of the bill into law. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

An unsigned bill cannot become law until the expiration of the 20 days, regardless of any notice given by the governor. 1971 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

When the legislature is not in session, the 20-day limitation applies to any bill in the possession of the governor if he does not sign or veto it; that is, he has 20 days after delivery in which to act. This is true even if the bill was delivered to his office before the adjournment of the legislative session. 1971 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Section 18. Effective Date.

Laws passed by the legislature become effective ninety days after enactment. The legislature may, by concurrence of two-thirds of the membership of each house, provide for another effective date.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. II, § 17. For time statutes become law and take effect, see AS

01.10.070

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the legislature is in or out of session and the bill under consideration has an effective date clause, then, in that event, the effective date to be recorded will be controlled by the terms of the clause establishing the effective date computed from the last moment in which the governor could have affirmatively acted. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Section 19. Local or Special Acts.

The legislature shall pass no local or special act if a general act can be made applicable. Whether a general act can be made applicable shall be subject to judicial determination. Local acts necessitating appropriations by a political subdivision may not become effective unless approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon in the subdivision affected.

Section 20. Impeachment.

All civil officers of the State are subject to impeachment by the legislature. Impeachment shall originate in the senate and must be approved by a two-thirds vote of its members. The motion for impeachment shall list fully the basis for the proceeding. Trial on impeachment shall be conducted by the house of representatives. A supreme court justice designated by the court shall preside at the trial. Concurrence of two-thirds of the members of the house is required for a judgment of impeachment. The judgment may not extend beyond removal from office, but shall not prevent proceedings in the courts on the same or related charges.

Cross references. —

For proceedings when a successful candidate for governor or lieutenant governor or a campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of that candidate has been convicted of a violation of the state election campaign laws, see AS

15.13.380(i)(2)

.

Section 21. Suits Against the State.

The legislature shall establish procedures for suits against the State.

Cross references. —

For actions against the state, see AS

09.50.250

et seq.